Hawaii statutes.
§663-1.3 "Ad damnum" clause
prohibited. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any action
based on tort, including a medical tort as defined in section 671-1, to recover
damages for personal injuries or wrongful death, no complaint, counterclaim,
cross claim or third party claim nor any amendment to such pleadings shall
specify the amount of damages prayed for but shall contain a prayer for general
relief, including a statement that the amount of damages is within the minimum
jurisdictional limits of the court in which the action is brought.

(b) If the complaint, counterclaim, cross
claim or third party claim or any amendment to such pleadings contains a
specified amount of damages, the claim, counterclaim, cross claim or third
party claim shall be dismissed by the court without prejudice; provided that,
upon the filing of a motion to dismiss a complaint on the grounds of
specificity of damages, the court shall allow the pleading to be amended in
lieu of dismissal at the request of the claimant. [L 1987, c 38, §1; am L 1988,
c 83, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next